Missouri, session 2026, HB2310.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 84.710 and 544.170, RSMo, are repealed and two new sections
enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as sections 84.710 and 544.170, to read as follows:
84.710. 1. The members of the police force appointed in pursuance hereof are hereby
declared to be officers of the state of Missouri and of the city for which such commissioners
are appointed.
2. They shall have power within the city or on public property of the city beyond the
corporate limits thereof to arrest, on view, any person they see violating or whom they have
reason to suspect of having violated any law of the state or ordinance of the city. They shall
have power to arrest and hold, without warrant, for a period of time not exceeding [twenty-
four] seventy-two hours, persons found within the city or on public property of the city
beyond the corporate limits thereof charged with having committed felonies in other states,
and who are reported to be fugitives from justice. They shall also have the power to stop any
person abroad whenever there is reasonable ground to suspect that he is committing, has
committed or is about to commit a crime and demand of him his name, address, business
abroad and whither he is going. When stopping or detaining a suspect, they may search him
for a dangerous weapon whenever they have reasonable ground to believe they are in danger
from the possession of such dangerous weapon by the suspect. No unreasonable force shall
be used in detaining or arresting any person, but such force as may be necessary may be used
when there is no other apparent means of making an arrest or preventing an escape and only
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2310 2
after the peace officer has made every reasonable effort to advise the person that he is the
peace officer engaged in making arrest.
3. Any person who has been arrested without a warrant may be released, without
being taken before a judge, by the officer in charge of the police station whenever the officer
is satisfied that there is no ground for making complaint against him, or when the person was
arrested for a misdemeanor and will sign a satisfactory agreement to appear in court at the
time designated.
544.170. 1. All persons arrested and confined in any jail or other place of
confinement by any peace officer, without warrant or other process, for any alleged breach of
the peace or other criminal offense, or on suspicion thereof, shall be discharged from said
custody within [twenty-four] seventy-two hours from the time of such arrest, unless they
shall be charged with a criminal offense by the oath of some credible person, and be held by
warrant to answer to such offense.
2. In any confinement to which the provisions of this section apply, the confinee shall
be permitted at any reasonable time to consult with counsel or other persons acting on the
confinee's behalf.
3. Any person who violates the provisions of this section, by refusing to release any
person who is entitled to release pursuant to this section, or by refusing to permit a confinee to
consult with counsel or other persons, or who transfers any such confinees to the custody or
control of another, or to another place, or who falsely charges such person, with intent to
avoid the provisions of this section, is guilty of a class A misdemeanor.
✔